South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S895.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Definitions SECTION 1.    Section 44-7-130(17) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (17)(a) "Hospital" means a facility that is organized and administered to provide overnight medical or surgical care or nursing care for an illness, injury, or infirmity and must provide on-campus emergency services; that may provide obstetrical care; and in which all diagnoses, treatment, or care is administered by or under the direction of persons currently licensed to practice medicine, surgery, or osteopathy. This definition shall include all hospitals that convert to Rural Emergency Hospitals pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Part 485 Subpart E and Section 125 of the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021. (b) "Hospital" may include a residential treatment facility for children, adolescents, or young adults in need of mental health treatment that is physically a part of a licensed psychiatric hospital. This definition does not include facilities that are licensed by the Department of Social Services. A residential treatment facility for children, adolescents, or young adults in need of mental health treatment that is physically part of a licensed psychiatric hospital is not required to provide on-campus emergency services. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________